Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.110

Public nuisance—Impounding.

Any horses, mules, donkeys, or cattle of any age running at large or trespassing in violation of chapter 16.24 RCW as now or hereafter amended, which are not restrained as provided by RCW 16.04.010, are declared to be a public nuisance. The sheriff of the county where found and the nearest brand inspector shall have authority to impound such animals which are not restrained as provided by RCW 16.04.010.

[ 1989 c 286 s 11; 1985 c 415 s 16; 1979 c 154 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 14; 1951 c 31 s 2. Formerly RCW 16.13.020.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.

Severability—1979 c 154: See note following RCW 15.49.330.